Utah statutes.
75-6-109.   Financial institution protection -- Payment after death or
disability -- Joint account.
Any sums in a joint account may be paid, on request, to any party without
regard to whether any other party is incapacitated or deceased at the time the
payment is demanded; but payment may not be made to the personal
representative or heirs of a deceased party unless proofs of death are
presented to the financial institution showing that the decedent was the last
surviving party or unless there is no right of survivorship under Section
75-6-104.
